New York, session 2025-2026, A8989.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 2 of section 5-b of the legisla- 2 tive law, as amended by section 1 of part PP of chapter 55 of the laws 3 of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. For purposes of this section, the term "outside earned income" 5 shall mean wages, salaries, fees and other forms of compensation for 6 services actually rendered. The amount of income shall be determined by 7 taxable income. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13336-01-5